District of Columbia statutes.
23-707

Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter —

(1)

the term “State” includes any territory or possession of the United States; and

(2)

the term “Governor” means the executive authority of a State.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 634, Pub. L. 91-358, title II, § 210(a)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 23-707.
1973 Ed., § 23-707.